en: Powdered sugars, Confectioner's sugars, Icing sugars
bg: Пудра захар
de: Puderzucker, Staubzucker, Dekorierzucker
es: Azúcar glas, Azúcar en polvo, Azúcar glacé
fi: tomusokerit
fr: Sucres glaces, Sucres impalpables, Sucres à glacer, Sucre glace
hr: Šećeri u prahu
it: Zucchero a velo
ja: 粉砂糖
nl: Poedersuikers

en: Caster sugars, Superfine sugars
fr: Sucres en poudre, Sucre en poudre
hr: Žešćeni šećeri
ja: 上白糖
nl: Griessuiker

en: granulated sugars
bg: гранулирана захар, кристална захар
de: Kristallzucker, Zucker mittelgross
es: Azúcar cristalizado
fi: kidesokeri
fr: Sucres cristal, sucre cristal, sucres en grain, sucre en grain
hr: šećer bijeli kristal, šećer kristal, bijeli kristal šećer
hu: kristálycukor
it: Zucchero semolato
ja: グラニュー糖
nl: Kristalsuiker
pt: Açucares granulados, Açúcar granulado

en: White sugars, Refined sugars, White sugar, Refined sugar
bg: Бяла захар, Рафинирана захар
da: Hvide sukre, Hvidt sukker
de: Weißzucker, weiße Zucker
es: Azúcares blancos, Azúcar blanco
fr: Sucres blancs, sucre blanc
hr: Granulirani šećeri
it: Zucchero bianco
nl: witte suiker
sv: Vitt socker

en: Blond sugars, light brown sugars
fr: Sucres blonds, Sucre blond

en: rock candies, rock sugars
de: Kandis, Kandisfarin, Kluntjes, Kandiszucker, Zuckerlompen
fr: sucres candi, sucre candi
hr: Kamenčići
ja: 氷砂糖
nl: Kandijsuikers

fr: sucres complets, sucre complet
it: Zucchero integrale

en: Lump sugar, Cube sugar, Sugar cubes
de: Würfelzucker, Stückenzucker, Zuckerwürfel, Bridge-Zucker
fi: sokeripalat
fr: sucres en morceaux, sucre en morceaux
hr: Šećer u grudima
it: Zollette di zucchero, Zucchero in zollette
ja: 角砂糖
nl: Suikerklontjes

fr: sucres gélifiant, sucre gélifiant
bg: Желираща захар
de: Gelierzucker
nl: Geleisuikers

en: Dextrose
xx: Dextrose
ca: Dextrosa
es: Dextrosa
nl: Dextrose, Druivensuiker

en: Vanilla sugars, Vanilla flavoured sugars
bg: Ванилова захар
de: Vanillenzucker
es: Azúcar vainillado, Azúcar vainillada
fi: Vaniljasokerit
fr: Sucres vanillés
hr: Vanilije šećere
it: Zuccheri di vaniglia
nl: Vanillesuikers

en: Vanillin sugars
de: Vanillin-Zucker
fr: Sucres vanillinés
hr: Vanilin šećeri
nl: Vanillinesuiker
pl: Cukier wanilinowy

en: Sugar substitutes
de: Zuckerersatzstoffe
es: Sustitutos del azúcar
fi: sokerin korvikkeet
fr: Succédanés du sucre
hr: Zamjene za šećer
it: Sostitutivi dello zucchero
ja: 砂糖の代用品
nl: Suikervervangers
pl: Zastępniki cukru, Substytuty cukru
pt: Substitutos do açúcar
ru: Заменители сахара

en: Artificial sugar substitutes, Artificial sweeteners
de: Künstliche Zuckeraustauschstoffe
es: Edulcorantes artificiales
fi: keinotekoiset sokerinkorvikkeet
fr: Édulcorants artificiels
hr: Umjetne zamjene za šećer
it: Dolcificanti artificiali, Sostituti artificiali dello zucchero
nl: Kunstmatige zoetstoffen
pl: Sztuczne zastępniki cukru, Sztuczne substytuty cukru
ru: Искусственные заменители сахара, Искусственные подсластители

en: Acesulfame potassium, Acesulfame K
es: Acesulfano potásico, Acesulfamo-k
fr: Acésulfame potassium, Acésulfame K
hr: Acesulfam kalij
la: E-950
pl: Acesulfam K, Acesulfam potasowy
zh: 安赛蜜

en: Stevia sweetener
fr: Édulcorant à base d'extrait de stévia
hr: Zaslađivač stevia
ja: ステビア由来の甘味料

en: Aspartame
bg: Аспартам
de: Aspartam
es: Aspartamo
fr: Aspartames
hr: Aspartam
ja: アスパルテーム
la: E-951
nl: Aspartaam
pl: Aspartam

en: Aspartame sweetener in tablets
fr: Édulcorant à l'aspartame en pastilles
hr: Zaslađivač aspartam u tabletama
pl: Aspartam w tabletkach

en: Aspartame in powder
bg: Аспартам на прах
fr: Édulcorant à l'aspartame en poudre
hr: Aspartam u prahu
pl: Aspartam w proszku

en: Light sugar with aspartame
fr: Sucre allégé à l'aspartame